California, session 20252026, AB2469.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65964.7 is added to the Government Code, to read:65964.7. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Water scarcity plan” means a report that includes measures to be implemented during an abnormally dry year, as a moderate drought year, a severe drought year, and an extreme drought year, and an exceptional drought year, as defined by the United States drought monitor, including staged withdrawal reductions, nonessential use curtailment, recycling and reuse, thermal load reductions, and temporary load shedding where necessary.(2) “Water use assessment” means a report that includes all of the following:(A) A description of the data center, including its location, identification of the owner and operator, and a detailed description of operations.(B) A detailed accounting of expected water intake, expressed in gallons per day and total volume, including:(i) Maximum and average daily demand.(ii) Maximum and average monthly demand.(iii) Demand over an average 12-month consecutive period.(iv) Water withdrawals.(v)Phases of growth or expansion.(vi)Trigger points for additional demand.(vii)Full build-out and peak operation scenarios.(C) A detailed explanation of each direct water use, including, but not limited to, cooling systems, humidification, potable and sanitary uses, fire suppression systems, and maintenance operations. For each use, the assessment includes identification of all of the following:(i) Input water quality requirements.(ii) Whether the use is consumptive.(iii) Average daily consumptive volume.(iv) Whether the use is continuous, intermittent, or seasonal.(v) Opportunities for reuse or closed-loop systems.(D) A cooling alternatives analysis that compares the proposed cooling method to a range of alternatives, including all of the following:(i) Evaluation of water use at the data center and at the site of energy generation.(ii) Evaluation of impact on source water and water scarcity.(iii) Consideration of closed-loop cooling.(E)A detailed estimate of indirect water use associated with energy production disaggregated by generation type.(F)A cost-of-service study completed by the applicable water provider within the last five years, or funded by the data center if none exists.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a city, county, or city and county shall not approve a discretionary or ministerial permit or other entitlement that would result in the construction, or expansion that increases the maximum peak water use, of a data center unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The applicant has provided the city, county, or city and county with all of the following:(A) A water supply assessment, as described in Part 2.10 (commencing with Section 10910) of Division 6 of the Water Code, for the construction or expansion.(B) Upon request of the city, county, or city and county, a water use assessment, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).(C) Beginning January 1, 2028, a water scarcity plan, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(D) Projected water use and water efficiency measures.(E) Disclosures regarding workforce needs associated with the project, including all of the following:(i) Workforce composition.(ii) Job classifications.(iii) Employment duration.(iv) Wage ranges and benefits.(v) The proportion of the workforce residing within the county in which the project is located.(vi) The proportion of the workforce residing within the state.(vii) All water resource plans, water usage reports, supporting documentation, and any approvals issued by a state or local agency related to the plans or applications.(2) The applicant assumes responsibility for the full cost of any required water conveyance, treatment or storage, or distribution infrastructure improvements necessary to serve the project, as determined by the Department of Water Resources or the applicable water supplier.(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a city, county, or city and county to approve a permit, entitlement, or other approval for the construction or expansion of a data center solely because the applicant has satisfied the requirements of this subdivision.SEC. 2. Section 10609.13 is added to the Water Code, to read:10609.13. (a)The department, in coordination with the board, shall conduct necessary studies and investigations and recommend, to develop a definition and estimate of annual water consumption, no later than June 30, 2028, a for CII water use classification system for users that qualify as large consumptive use consumptive-use facilities, including data centers. The classification system required by this section shall be separate and distinct from classifications applicable to other CII water use. centers and similar water consumption patterns. CII outdoor irrigation water use that is served through a dedicated irrigation meter shall be excluded from the definition and estimate.(b)(1)The board, in coordination with the department, shall adopt the classification for CII water use required by this section on or before December 31, 2029.(2)Each urban retail water supplier shall implement the classification adopted by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that water conservation is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Section 65964.7 to the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.